Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
WORKFORCE DATA
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Education workforce” means licensed and classified staff who are:
(A) Employed by a public education provider; or
(B) Under contract to provide services to a public education provider.
(b) “Public education provider” means:
(A) A school district;
(B) A public charter school;
(C) An education service district;
(D) A long term care or treatment facility, as described in ORS 343.961;
(E) The Youth Corrections Education Program;
(F) The Juvenile Detention Education Program; or
(G) The Oregon School for the Deaf.
(2) For the purpose of supporting the education workforce in this state:
(a) The Department of Education  shall develop and implement a plan to establish and
maintain a statewide data system on the education workforce in this state.
(b) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission shall develop and implement a plan
to establish and maintain the statewide portal for jobs in education, as described in  section
5 (1)(b), chapter 116, Oregon  Laws 2022, and shall consider whether to make available exit
surveys as part of the portal.
(3)(a) The Department of Education shall convene a steering committee  to assist the
department in developing a business case  for the statewide data system described in sub-
section (2)(a) of this section.
(b) The steering committee convened under this subsection shall consist of:
(A) One representative from each educator preparation program in this state;
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 1
(B) One representative from the department;
(C) One representative from the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission;
(D) One representative from the Educator Advancement Council;
(E) One representative from the Higher Education Coordinating Commission;
(F) One representative from a statewide organization that primarily represents licensed
staff of the education workforce;
(G) One representative from a statewide organization that primarily  represents classified
staff of the education workforce;
(H) One representative from a statewide  organization that represents school adminis-
trators;
(I) One representative from a statewide organization that represents school boards; and
(J) One representative who is an expert on the statewide longitudinal data system.
(c) The statewide data system  developed as provided by this subsection must allow the
department to assign unique identifiers to each individual who is a  member of the education
workforce. The identifier may not use any personally  identifiable information, except for
alignment purposes in data processing. Any personally identifiable information that is col-
lected must be linked  in a secure data location so that data sets can be matched based on
the personally identifiable information when the identifier is included.
(d) The statewide data  system developed as provided by this subsection must allow the
following uses:
(A) Identifying school district hiring needs by content area and geographic location;
(B) Providing information, by content  area, about graduates of educator preparation
programs and persons who complete nontraditional pathways to licensure;
(C) Identifying educator mobility, attrition and retention patterns;
(D) Determining educator longevity and possible factors that affect longevity;
(E) Evaluating school climate  and culture from the educator’s perspective based on the
surveys administered as provided by section 4 of this 2023 Act;
(F) Evaluating pay in relation  to local economic data from the most recent American
Community Survey from the United States Census Bureau; and
(G) Studying education workforce trends and needs in this state in a manner that:
(i) Includes a review of:
(I) The satisfaction  of persons who complete educator preparation programs in this state;
(II) Employer  satisfaction with the availability and skills of the education workforce in
this state; and
(III) Hiring and retention trends of the education workforce in this state; and
(ii) Is sortable by school district, geographic location,  school, grade level, teacher char-
acteristics and educator preparation program of this state.
(e) To the greatest extent practicable, the department and steering committee shall:
(A) Ensure that the collection of data under the statewide data system aligns with  the
collection of data under ORS 342.443; and
(B) Reduces redundancies by incorporating any other relevant data processes or proce-
dures.
(f) The steering committee shall assist the  department in ensuring that the information
described in paragraph (d) of this subsection is available to the public  through a visually
appealing interactive data visualization tool that is accessible on  the department’s website
home page.
(g) The Department of Education shall consult with  each public education provider, the
Teacher Standards and Practices Commission, the  Educator Advancement Council, the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission and the public  universities listed in ORS 352.002
to ensure that each  entity is prepared to collect information as required for the statewide
data system.
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 2
(h) The department shall consider whether to enter into a contract or  a partnership with
any public or private entity, including the  federal government, for the purpose of the state-
wide data system.
(4) The Department of  Education and the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission
shall submit a report on the actions required to be taken under subsection (2) of this  section
in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for  legislation,
to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related  to education no later than
September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to  the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission by section 1, chapter _____,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5537), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, is in-
creased by $205,000 for the establishment of the statewide portal for jobs  in education, as
required under section 1 (2)(b) of this 2023 Act.
EDUCATOR WORKFORCE SURVEYS
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Education workforce” means licensed and classified staff who are:
(A) Employed by a public education provider; or
(B) Under contract to provide services to a public education provider.
(b) “Public education provider” means:
(A) A school district;
(B) A public charter school;
(C) An education service district;
(D) A long term care or treatment facility, as described in ORS 343.961;
(E) The Youth Corrections Education Program;
(F) The Juvenile Detention Education Program; or
(G) The Oregon School for the Deaf.
(2) Each public education provider shall:
(a) Encourage members of the  education workforce of the public education provider to
participate in a survey administered by the Department of Education that is designed to  as-
sist in the gathering of information  about the working experiences of the education
workforce of this state, including the experience in the school district and in individual
schools; and
(b) Ensure  that members of the education workforce of the public education provider
have the opportunity to participate  in the survey described in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section.
(3) The State Board of Education, in collaboration with the Educator  Advancement
Council, shall adopt by rule the standards for the survey administered under this section.
(4) The department shall annually review the survey identified in  subsection (2) of this
section and:
(a) Make the information available to school district boards,  administrators of school
districts and administrators of schools in a manner that allows for the accessibility  of the
information:
(A) On a district level and a school level; and
(B) Through the interactive data visualization tool; and
(b) Report annually on education workforce satisfaction to the  interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to education.
(5) The department may enter into a contract or a partnership with  any public or private
entity, including the federal government, for the purpose of this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 3
SPECIAL EDUCATION EDUCATORS AND EMPLOYEES
SECTION 5. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Classified school employee” includes all employees of  a school district except those
for whom a teaching or administrative license is required as a basis  for employment in a
school district.
(b) “Individualized education program” has the meaning given that term in ORS 343.035.
(c) “Licensed  educator” means a teacher, administrator or other school professional who
is licensed, registered or certified by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission.
(d) “Salary” has the meaning given that term in ORS 653.010.
(e) “School district” means:
(A) A common school district or a union high school district.
(B) An education service district.
(2) For each licensed educator or classified school employee who  provides significant
special education support, as determined under subsection (3) of this section,  a school dis-
trict may pay one or more of the following:
(a) An additional percentage of the educator’s or employee’s salary or hourly wage.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 652.220, a one-time payment in addition to the educator’s or
employee’s salary or hourly wage.
(3) For purposes of this section, a licensed educator or  a classified school employee pro-
vides significant special education support  if 75 percent or more of the educator’s or
employee’s student caseload consists  of students who have an individualized education pro-
gram.
(4) A salary or  wage increase specified in subsection (2) of this section is exclusive of
health benefits and other benefits the  school district provides to licensed educators or clas-
sified school employees or that are otherwise required under the laws of this state.
SECTION 6.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Classified school employee” includes all employees of  a school district except those
for whom a teaching or administrative license is required as a basis  for employment in a
school district.
(b) “Individualized education program” has the meaning given that term in ORS 343.035.
(c) “School district” means:
(A) A common school district or a union high school district.
(B) An education service district.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of  this section, a school district that employs
classified school employees who provide significant special education  support, as determined
under subsection (4) of this section, may not establish,  for any purpose, a policy that re-
quires the work day hours of a classified school  employee to be fewer than five hours per
work day on regular school days  when schools are normally in operation and students are
present.
(3)(a) A school district may reduce the work  day hours of a classified school employee
to fewer than five hours per work day  if the reduction in hours is at the written request of
the employee.
(b) A school district may not coerce or require, as a condition of employment or  contin-
uation of employment, a classified school employee to make a request for a reduction in work
day hours.
(4) For the purpose  of this section, a classified school employee provides significant spe-
cial education support if 75 percent or  more of the employee’s student caseload consists of
students who have an individualized education program.
SECTION 7.
Section 6 of this 2023 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2024.
CRISIS RESPONSE IN SCHOOL DISTRICTS
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 4
SECTION 8. (1) As used in this section, “certified instructor” means an individual who
is certified as an instructor by the  Crisis Prevention Institute’s Nonviolent Crisis Inter-
vention program or by  another program administered by a nationally recognized organization
that provides training to certify individuals in nonviolent crisis intervention methods.
(2) The  Department of Education shall establish and maintain the Safe School Culture
Grant program. The purpose of the program is to  develop a network of instructors who are
certified in nonviolent crisis  intervention methods to ensure that, for every 50 students in
a school district or an education service district, at least one staff person  of the school dis-
trict or education service district is certified in nonviolent crisis intervention methods.
(3) The department  shall distribute funds under the program to school districts and ed-
ucation service districts in  the manner prescribed by the State Board of Education by rule.
At a minimum, the rules shall:
(a) Establish the manner by which reimbursement is provided to  school districts and
education service districts for wages or stipends paid to staff for  the time spent by the staff
to attend training to become certified instructors;
(b) Ensure school districts and education service districts are reimbursed only for the
costs related to individuals who complete the certification process as  newly certified in-
structors; and
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b)  of this subsection, permit any unexpended moneys
from grants to be used to support the costs of training staff in  nonviolent crisis intervention
methods by providing stipends and reimbursement for the cost of materials.
(4) To qualify for a grant under the program, a school district must:
(a) Require each newly  certified instructor to conduct at least three complete trainings
of at least 10 staff persons each year.
(b) Provide or arrange for the provision of the necessary physical  space for the training.
(c) Consult with organizations  representing teachers and instructional assistants to de-
termine the priority for which  staff to train to ensure training is targeted to the areas in
most need of support for increasing the safety of students and staff.
(d) Consult with organizations representing teachers and instructional  assistants about
compensation in wages, stipends  or other means to support staff to participate in training
to become  certified instructors or to participate in training conducted by certified instruc-
tors to become certified in nonviolent crisis intervention methods.
(5) To qualify for a grant under the program, an education service district must:
(a) Ensure  at least one complete nonviolent crisis intervention training of at least 10
staff persons is completed each  month at the verbal intervention level or the physical
intervention level, except that trainings for July and December may be offered in alternative
months.
(b) Provide or arrange for the provision of the necessary physical  space for the training.
(c) Not charge a fee to a school district or a staff  member for the first 10 staff persons
trained by certified instructors each year.
(d) Offer training in advanced physical skills only to individuals working in settings in
which serious injuries have occurred or are at imminent risk of occurring.
(6) Notwithstanding subsection (4)(a) or (5)(a) of this subsection:
(a) For a school district with fewer than 30 employees, require each newly certified  in-
structor to conduct as many complete trainings as possible each year.
(b) For an education service district with fewer than 30 employees, ensure as  many
nonviolent crisis intervention trainings as possible are completed each year.
(7) The department shall biennially distribute  funds to school districts participating in
the program as follows:
(a) The department shall provide to a school district with 1,500 or fewer students a grant
in an amount  to reimburse the school district for the cost of one new certified instructor.
If the school district pays for the cost of a second  new certified instructor, the department
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 5
shall provide the school district with an amount to reimburse the school district for the  cost
of a third new certified instructor.
(b) The department shall provide to a school district with between  1,501 and 5,000 stu-
dents a grant in an amount to reimburse the school district for the cost of two new  certified
instructors. If the school district pays for the cost of a third  new certified instructor, the
department shall provide the  school district with an amount to reimburse the school district
for the cost of a fourth new certified instructor.
(c) The department shall provide to a school district with between 5,001  and 8,000 stu-
dents a grant in an amount to reimburse the school district for the cost of two new  certified
instructors. If the school district pays  for the cost of additional new certified instructors,
the department shall  provide the school district with an amount to reimburse the school
district for the cost of the  additional new certified instructors, up to a total of four new
certified instructors.
(d) The department shall provide to a school district  with between 8,001 and 15,000 stu-
dents a grant in an amount to reimburse  the school district for the cost of four new certified
instructors. If the school  district pays for the cost of additional new certified instructors,
the department shall  provide the school district with an amount to reimburse the school
district for the  cost of the additional new certified instructors, up to a total of eight new
certified instructors.
(e) The department shall provide to a school  district with between 15,001 and 30,000 stu-
dents a grant in an amount to reimburse the school district for the  cost of six new certified
instructors. If the school  district pays for the cost of additional new certified instructors,
the department shall  provide the school district with an amount to reimburse the school
district for the cost of the additional new certified instructors, up to a total of 14 new  cer-
tified instructors.
(f) The department shall provide to a school district with more than 30,000 students a
grant in an amount to reimburse the school district for the cost  of six new certified in-
structors. If the  school district pays for the cost of additional new certified instructors, the
department shall provide the  school district with an amount to reimburse the school district
for the cost of the additional new certified instructors, up to a total  of 16 new certified in-
structors.
(8) The department shall  biennially distribute funds through the program to education
service districts for two new certified instructors in advanced physical skills and one new
certified instructor in verbal and physical intervention skills. The  grant must match the cost
of the additional new certified instructors, up to a maximum of four new certified instructors
in advanced physical skills and two new  certified instructors in verbal and physical inter-
vention skills.
(9) The department may use up to  three percent of the grant funds to cover the
department’s costs in administering the program under this section.
(10) Notwithstanding subsections (3), (7) and (8) of this section, the department shall
distribute funds to school districts and education service  districts subject to the availability
of funding for the program.
SECTION 9.
(1) As used in this section, “certified instructor” has  the meaning given that
term in section 8 of this 2023 Act.
(2) A school district or an  education service district that participates in the Safe School
Culture Grant program established in section 8 of  this 2023 Act shall submit the following
reports to the Department of Education on or before the specified dates:
(a) By December 1, 2023, and again by July 1, 2024, a report that includes:
(A) The total number  of new certified instructors that were certified between July 1,
2023, and the date of the report, including the dates on  which the certified instructors re-
ceived their certifications.
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 6
(B) A description of how the certified instructors are distributed  across the school dis-
trict or education service district.
(C) An accounting of how many of the  new certified instructors were funded by the
school district and how many were funded by the grant provided by the  Safe School Culture
Grant program.
(D) The number of trainings held by each of the new certified instructors.
(E) The number of staff who were certified in  nonviolent crisis intervention methods by
completing a training by one of the new certified instructors.
(b) By December 1, 2024, and again by July 1, 2025, each school district  and education
service district participating in the grant program shall report to the department:
(A) The total number of staff who were certified in  nonviolent crisis intervention meth-
ods by completing a training with one of the new certified instructors.
(B) The total number  of staff who were certified in nonviolent crisis intervention meth-
ods by completing a training in verbal skills only.
(C) The total number of staff who were certified in nonviolent crisis intervention  meth-
ods by completing a training in verbal and physical intervention skills.
(D) The total number of  staff who were certified in nonviolent crisis intervention meth-
ods by completing a training in advanced physical skills.
(E) The total number of trainings held by each of the newly  certified instructors between
July 1, 2023, and the date of the trainings.
(F) A description of how the staff who  were certified in nonviolent crisis intervention
methods by completing a training are distributed across the  school district or education
service district, including the ratio of trained staff to students in the school district or edu-
cation service district.
(G) A description of the school district’s or education service district’s  assessment of
how many additional certified instructors, if any, are needed to certify staff in  nonviolent
crisis intervention methods.
SECTION 10.
The Department of Education  shall first provide grants through the Safe
School Culture Grant program, established in section 8 of  this 2023 Act, no later than July
1, 2024.
SECTION 11. Section 9 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Education by section 2 (2), chapter _____, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled House Bill 5014), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for  other K-12 grant-in-
aid programs, is increased by $5,000,000 for the Safe School Culture Grant  program estab-
lished by section 8 of this 2023 Act.
NOTE:
 Sections 13 through 17 were deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were  not re-
numbered.
WORKING CONDITIONS
SECTION 18.  ORS 332.544 is amended to read:
332.544. (1) As used in this section, “classified school employee” includes all  employees of a
[public] school district except those for  whom a teaching or administrative license is required as a
basis for employment in a [ public] school district.
[(2) A classified school employee  who has been demoted or dismissed shall be entitled to a hearing
before the school board if a written request is  filed with the board within 15 days of the dismissal or
demotion.]
(2) A classified school employee shall have the right to be dismissed,  demoted or disci-
plined only for just cause.
(3) School district employees subject to  the civil service provisions of ORS [ chapter 242] 242.310
to 242.640 are exempt from the provisions of this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 7
SECTION 19. Section 20 of  this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 334.
SECTION 20. (1) As used in this  section, “classified school employee” includes all em-
ployees of an education  service district except those for whom a teaching or administrative
license is required as a basis for employment in an education service district.
(2) A classified school  employee shall have the right to be dismissed, demoted or disci-
plined only for just cause.
SUBSTITUTE TEACHERS
SECTION 21. (1) The Task Force on Substitute Teachers is established.
(2) The task force consists of 12 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint two members from among  members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of  Representatives shall appoint two members from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint eight members as follows:
(A) One member who is a representative of an association  that primarily represents li-
censed educators;
(B) One member  who is a representative of an organization that represents substitute
teachers;
(C) One member who is  a representative of a coalition that represents school adminis-
trators;
(D) One member who is a representative of an association that represents school boards;
(E) One member who is a representative of  an organization that represents education
service districts;
(F) One member who is a representative of a third-party employment service provider
for substitute teachers;
(G) One  member who is a representative of the Teacher Standards and Practices Com-
mission; and
(H) One member who is a representative of the Department of Education.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Review school district requests for proposal related to substitute teachers;
(b) Conduct a cost savings analysis of providing substitute teachers through  third-party
employment service providers;
(c) Examine policies in other states related  to the use of third-party employment service
providers for substitute teachers;
(d) Explore a model that provides the services of substitute teachers through education
service districts;
(e) Explore processes  that ensure substitute teachers are provided access to electronic
mail and Internet service, as is necessary for their service as a substitute teacher;
(f) Establish  a model policy for ensuring that substitute teachers are supervised by li-
censed administrators; and
(g) Develop recommendations for legislation related to standards for contracts for  sub-
stitute teachers through third-party employment service providers.
(4) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(5) Official action  by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an  appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 8
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call  of the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit  a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to an interim committee of  the Legislative
Assembly related to education no later than September 15, 2024.
(11) The Legislative Policy and  Research Director shall provide staff support to the task
force.
(12) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are  nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(13) Members of the task force who are not members of the  Legislative Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on  the task
force.
(14) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance  of the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the
task force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 22.
Section 21 of this 2023 Act is repealed on December 31, 2024.
SECTION 23. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Legislative Policy and  Research Committee by section 15, chapter _____, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5516), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, is  increased
by $300,000 for the task force established under section 21 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 24.  ORS 342.610 is amended to read:
342.610. (1)(a) [ Teachers employed as substitute  teachers shall not ] A teacher employed as a
substitute teacher may not be paid less per day than  85 percent of 1/190th of the statewide av-
erage salary of a  beginning teacher who holds a bachelor’s degree. [ The salary of the substitute
teacher shall be computed as required in this subsection based on the statewide average salary for be-
ginning teachers who hold bachelor’s degrees. ]
(b) The Department of Education shall compute  the statewide average salary of a beginning
teacher who holds a bachelor’s degree  to be used for purposes of this subsection[ ,] by:
(A) Using the latest data available to the department[ , but not ]; and
(B) Not using  data from earlier than the preceding school year.
(2) [ The] A school district shall set the working hours for a substitute teacher[ ,] and, when
[employed,] a teacher is employed as a substitute teacher for the school district, the school
district shall pay the substitute teacher a salary that is :
(a) No less than one-half of the daily  minimum salary computed under subsection (1) of this
section[ . However, if the substitute  teacher is employed for more than one-half day, the substitute
teacher shall receive a  full day’s pay. ] if the teacher is employed as a substitute teacher for less
than one-half day; or
(b) No less than the daily minimum salary computed under subsection (1) of this  section
if the teacher is employed as a substitute teacher for one-half day or more.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, [ teachers employed as substitute teachers ] a
teacher employed as a substitute teacher  for more than 10 consecutive days in any one assign-
ment for the same teacher shall not be paid  after the 10th day of the assignment less per day
than:
(A) For school districts with no salary scale,  100 percent of 1/190th of the statewide average
salary computed in subsection (1) of this section [ for districts with no salary scale; or, ]; or
(B) For school districts with a salary scale, the higher of:
[(A)] (i) 1/190th of  the employing school district’s salary for a beginning teacher who holds a
bachelor’s degree; or
[(B)] (ii) The daily minimum salary computed under subsection (1) of this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 9
(b) Used sick leave,  whether paid or unpaid, and weekends, school holidays and days when
schools are closed by weather or other conditions and when  substitute teachers are not required to
appear in person at the school [ shall] may not be considered in determining consecutive  days for
purposes of this subsection.
(c) When substituting for a part-time teacher, the part of  the day worked by the substitute
teacher shall count as a full day in determining consecutive days for purposes of this subsection.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (3) of this section, if a school  district has a class
schedule based on a four-day week:
(a) The daily minimum salary  computed under subsection (1) or (3) of this section must be
multiplied by 1.125; and
(b) Calculations described in subsection (3) of this section must be made after a teacher has been
employed as a substitute teacher for more than eight consecutive days in any one assignment for
the same teacher.
(5)(a) A school district shall classify a substitute teaching  assignment as a temporary
position when the school district determines that a teacher will be employed as a  substitute
teacher for 60 or more consecutive days in any one assignment for the same teacher.
(b) The designation under paragraph (a) of this subsection must occur either:
(A) At the beginning of the substitute teaching assignment; or
(B) As  soon as practicable, but no later than 10 consecutive days, after the school district
determines that a substitute teaching assignment will be extended to 60 or more consecutive
days.
(c) If a school district has a class schedule based on a four-day week, the school  district
shall:
(A) Classify a substitute teaching assignment  as a temporary position when the school
district determines that a teacher will be employed as a substitute teacher for 48  or more
consecutive days in any one assignment for the same teacher; and
(B) Make the designation described in paragraph (b)(B) of this subsection when the
school district  determines that a teacher will be employed as a substitute teacher for 48 or
more consecutive days in any one assignment for the same teacher.
(d) Nothing in this subsection prohibits a school  district from making the classification
required under paragraph (a) or (c) of this subsection after fewer consecutive days.
(6) A teacher employed by a school district as  a substitute teacher shall be paid for any
training that  is required for that teacher to apply for or be assigned to a substitute teaching
assignment.
[(5)] (7) This section does not apply to  substitute teachers represented in a bargaining unit in
the school district by which they are employed.
SECTION 25.
The amendments to ORS 342.610  by section 24 of this 2023 Act first apply
to the 2023-2024 school year.
TASK FORCE ON EDUCATOR SALARIES
SECTION 26. (1) The Task Force on Statewide Educator Salary Schedules is established.
(2) The task force consists of 12 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall  appoint one member who is the chairperson of the
Senate interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related to education.
(b) The Speaker of the  House of Representatives shall appoint one member who is the
chairperson of the House interim committee of the  Legislative Assembly related to educa-
tion.
(c) The President of the Senate and the Speaker  of the House of Representatives shall
jointly appoint the following 10 members:
(A) A member who  is a representative of a coalition that represents school administra-
tors;
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 10
(B) A member who is a representative of an association that represents school boards;
(C) A member who is a representative of an association that  primarily represents li-
censed educators;
(D) A member who is a representative of an  association that primarily represents clas-
sified educator staff;
(E) A member who is a superintendent of a school district;
(F) A member who is a licensed teacher of a school district;
(G) A member who is a classified school employee at a school district;
(H) A member  who is a business manager or a human resources manager for a school
district; and
(I) Two members who are parents of students in the public schools of this state.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Study the benefits and challenges of implementing a statewide salary schedule  for
educators in this state.
(b) Propose  a statewide salary schedule for educators, which must include regional dif-
ferences. When developing the statewide salary schedule, the task force must:
(A) Consider whether the regional differences shall align with the regions specified in
ORS 653.025 or make recommendations for other regional designations.
(B) Consider and make recommendations regarding pay for student teachers.
(C) Consider  and make recommendations regarding pay for educators and classified
school employees when 75 percent or more of the educator’s or employee’s student  caseload
consists of students who have an individualized education program.
(4) A majority of the members of the  task force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(5) Official  action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the members
of the task force.
(6) The members of the task force who are members of  the Legislative Assembly shall
serve as cochairpersons.
(7) If  there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the
cochairpersons or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit  a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to  the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to education no later than:
(a) December 31,  2023, to provide information on the study described in subsection (3)(a)
of this section; and
(b) September 15, 2024, to propose  the statewide salary schedule for educators described
in subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(11) The Legislative Policy and  Research Director shall provide staff support to the task
force.
(12) Members of the task force who are not members of the  Legislative Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on  the task
force.
(13) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance  of the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the
task force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 27.
Section 26 of this 2023 Act is repealed on December 31, 2024.
SECTION 28. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Legislative Policy and  Research Committee by section 15, chapter _____, Oregon
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 11
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5516), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, is increased
by $495,000 for the task force established under section 26 of this 2023 Act.
APPRENTICESHIP AND MENTORSHIP GRANTS
SECTION 29. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Education by section 2 (2), chapter _____, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled House Bill 5014), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for  other K-12 grant-in-
aid programs, is  increased by $10,000,000 to award grants to promote registered apprentice-
ships for educators and  to promote the beginning teacher and administrator mentorship
program established as provided by ORS 329.795, with priority given to:
(1) The development of educators who hold an endorsement related to special education.
(2) The development of educators serving school districts in rural areas.
(3) The development of educators who are diverse, as defined in ORS 342.433.
(4) The development of educators who hold an emergency teaching license.
(5) The continuation of existing mentorship relationships.
TEACHER LICENSURE
SECTION 30.
 ORS 342.125 is amended to read:
342.125. (1) Teaching licenses shall be issued and renewed by  the Teacher Standards and Prac-
tices Commission by the authority of the State of Oregon, subject to ORS 342.120 to 342.430 and the
rules of the commission.
(2) Notwithstanding any requirements prescribed for issuance  of a license, a person whose ap-
plication for a license is pending may be employed in the public schools of this  state for 90 calendar
days after the date of submission of the application if:
(a) The person is  not ineligible for a license following background checks conducted by the
Teacher  Standards  and Practices Commission, including a criminal records check as provided in
ORS 181A.195 and a background check  through an interstate clearinghouse of revoked and sus-
pended licenses;
(b) The school district has completed the review of the employment history  of the person as
required by ORS 339.374;
(c) The person had not been employed as provided by this subsection during the previous 12
months with a pending application for the same license; and
(d) The person and the school district have complied with any other requirements  established
by the commission by rule.
(3) Subject to ORS 342.130 and to subsection (4) of  this section, licenses shall be of the following
types:
(a) Preliminary teaching license.
(b) Professional teaching license.
(c) Distinguished teacher leader license.
(d) Preliminary personnel service license.
(e) Professional personnel service license.
(f) Preliminary administrative license.
(g) Professional administrative license.
(h) Reciprocal license.
(i) Legacy license.
(4) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission  may establish other types of teaching li-
censes as the commission  considers necessary for operation of the public schools of the state and
may prescribe the qualifications for the  licenses. However, no license established under the au-
thority of this subsection is required for a regular classroom teaching position in  the public schools.
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 12
(5) Notwithstanding 342.127, any  person who has held a teaching license identified in
subsection (3) of this section or established as provided by subsection (4)  of this section may,
within three years of retirement and without payment of any fees or  any other additional
requirements, convert the teaching license into a substitute teaching license.
[(5)(a)] (6)(a) The Teacher  Standards and Practices Commission shall establish a public charter
school teacher and administrator  registry. The commission shall require the applicant and the public
charter  school  to jointly submit an application requesting registration as a public charter school
teacher or administrator. The application shall include:
(A) A description of the specific teaching or administrator position the applicant will fill;
(B) A description of the background of the  applicant that is relevant to the teaching or admin-
istrator position, including any post-secondary education or other experience; and
(C) Documentation as required by the commission for the purposes of conducting a criminal  re-
cords check as provided in ORS 181A.195 and  a background check through an interstate clearing-
house of revoked and suspended licenses.
(b) Subject to the results of the criminal records check and background check and  to informa-
tion received under ORS 342.143 (2), the commission shall approve the application for registration.
The commission may deny a request for registration only on the basis  of the criminal records check,
the background  check through an interstate clearinghouse of revoked and suspended licenses or the
information received under ORS  342.143 (2). The registration is valid for a term established by the
commission and, subject to information  received under ORS 342.143 (2), may be renewed upon joint
application from the teacher or administrator and the public charter school.
(c) A registration as a public charter school teacher qualifies  its holder to accept the teaching
position described in the application in the  public charter school that submitted the application with
the holder of the registration.
(d) A registration as a public charter school administrator qualifies its holder to  accept the
administrator position described in the application in the  public charter school that submitted the
application with the holder of the registration.
[(6)(a)] (7)(a) The Teacher Standards and Practices  Commission shall adopt an expedited process
for the issuance of any license established pursuant to this section. The expedited process may  re-
quire the following:
(A) The showing of an urgent situation; and
(B) The joint request for the expedited process from the applicant for the license and:
(i) The school district superintendent or school district board;
(ii) The public charter school governing body; or
(iii) The education service district superintendent or  board of directors of the education service
district.
(b) Except as provided by paragraph (c) of this subsection, the commission shall issue  a license
as provided by this subsection within two working days after receiving a completed application.
(c) The  commission may limit the number of applications the commission will accept under this
subsection from a school district or an education service district to not more than 100  applications
in a period of two working days.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, the commission may not distinguish between a school district
or an education service district involved in a labor dispute  and any other school district or educa-
tion service district.
SECTION 31.
 ORS 342.127 is amended to read:
342.127. (1) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission shall establish and collect:
(a) A fee not to exceed $350 for evaluation of the initial  application for each educator license
for which application is made. If the applicant is  eligible for the educator license for which appli-
cation is made, the commission shall issue the license without additional charge.
(b) A fee not to exceed $350 for the renewal of each educator license and a  fee not to exceed
$50 for each official paper  license. If the educator is certified by a national professional organization
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 13
for teaching standards recognized by the commission, the commission shall  renew the license with-
out charge.
(c) A fee not to exceed  $800 for a beginning educator assessment conducted in lieu of an ap-
proved preparation program required for licensure.
(d) A fee  not to exceed $350 for registration as a public charter school teacher or administrator
that includes any fee charged pursuant to rules adopted under ORS 181A.195.
(e) A fee not to exceed $350 for renewal of a registration as a public charter school teacher  or
administrator that includes any fee charged pursuant to rules adopted under ORS 181A.195.
(2) In addition to the fee required by subsection (1) of this  section for the issuance of an edu-
cator license, the  commission shall collect a fee not to exceed $150 for the evaluation of an appli-
cant requesting licensing based upon completion of an educator preparation program other than  an
Oregon approved educator preparation program.
(3) In addition to the fees required by subsection (1) of this section, the commission  shall collect
a late application fee not to exceed $40 per month up to a maximum of  $200 from an applicant who
fails to make timely application for renewal  of the license or registration. The actual amount of the
fee shall be determined in accordance with rules of the commission.
(4) In addition to the fees required by subsection (1) of this section, the commission  shall collect
a late application fee not to exceed $350 for the reinstatement of an  expired license. The require-
ments for  reinstatement and the actual amount of the fee shall be determined in accordance with
rules of the commission.
(5) Notwithstanding the expiration date posted on  the license, the license shall continue to be
valid for an additional 120 days, provided the educator has made a  timely application, as determined
by the commission, for renewal prior to the expiration date on the license.
(6) In addition to the fee required by subsection (1) of this  section for the issuance of an edu-
cator license, the commission shall collect a fee not to exceed $1,000 for the reinstatement of a  li-
cense that has been suspended or revoked by  the commission for gross neglect of duty or gross
unfitness under ORS 342.175.
(7) In addition to the fee required by  subsection (1) of this section for the issuance of an edu-
cator license, the commission shall collect a fee  not to exceed $200 for the issuance of any license
through an expedited process under ORS 342.125 [ (6)] (7) at the request of any school district, public
charter school or education service district that seeks to  employ the applicant. The fee shall be paid
by the school district, public charter school or education service district.
(8)(a) The commission shall establish and collect:
(A) A fee for each approved educator preparation provider, based  on the number of license ap-
plications received by the commission from the provider; and
(B) A fee for each approved educator preparation provider, based on the type of educator prep-
aration programs that the provider offers.
(b) Notwithstanding  paragraph (a) of this subsection, the commission may establish and collect
a flat fee for the purposes described in paragraph (a)  of this subsection if the number of teacher
applicants enrolled in the educator  preparation programs offered by the educator preparation pro-
vider does not exceed a number identified by the commission by rule.
(c) The method  for determining the fee and the actual amount of the fee imposed under this
subsection shall be determined in accordance with rules of the commission.
(9) Fees established under this section  shall cover, but not exceed, the full cost of administrative
expenses incurred by the commission during any biennium.
SECTION 32.
 ORS 342.127, as amended by section  4, chapter 647, Oregon Laws 2021, is
amended to read:
342.127. (1) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission shall establish and collect:
(a) A fee not to exceed  $350 for evaluation of the initial application for each educator license
for which application is made. If the applicant is  eligible for the educator license for which appli-
cation is made, the commission shall issue the license without additional charge.
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 14
(b) A fee not to  exceed $350 for the renewal of each educator license and a fee not to exceed
$50 for each official paper  license. If the educator is certified by a national professional organization
for teaching standards recognized by  the commission, the commission shall renew the license with-
out charge.
(c) A fee not to exceed  $800 for a beginning educator assessment conducted in lieu of an ap-
proved preparation program required for licensure.
(d) A fee  not to exceed $350 for registration as a public charter school teacher or administrator
that includes any fee charged pursuant to rules adopted under ORS 181A.195.
(e) A fee not to exceed $350 for renewal of a registration as a public charter school teacher  or
administrator that includes any fee charged pursuant to rules adopted under ORS 181A.195.
(2) In addition to the fee required by subsection (1) of this  section for the issuance of an edu-
cator license, the  commission shall collect a fee not to exceed $150 for the evaluation of an appli-
cant requesting licensing based upon completion of an educator preparation program other than  an
Oregon approved educator preparation program.
(3) In addition to the fees required by subsection (1) of this section, the commission  shall collect
a late application fee not to exceed $40 per month up to a maximum of  $200 from an applicant who
fails to make timely application for renewal  of the license or registration. The actual amount of the
fee shall be determined in accordance with rules of the commission.
(4) In addition to the fees required by subsection (1) of this section, the commission  shall collect
a late application fee not to exceed $350 for the reinstatement of an  expired license. The require-
ments for  reinstatement and the actual amount of the fee shall be determined in accordance with
rules of the commission.
(5) Notwithstanding the expiration date posted on  the license, the license shall continue to be
valid for an additional 120 days, provided the educator has made a  timely application, as determined
by the commission, for renewal prior to the expiration date on the license.
(6) In addition to the fee required by subsection (1) of this  section for the issuance of an edu-
cator license, the commission shall collect a fee not to exceed $1,000 for the reinstatement of a  li-
cense that has been suspended or revoked by  the commission for gross neglect of duty or gross
unfitness under ORS 342.175.
(7) In addition to the fee required by  subsection (1) of this section for the issuance of an edu-
cator license, the commission shall collect a fee  not to exceed $200 for the issuance of any license
through an expedited process under ORS 342.125 [ (6)] (7) at the request of any school district, public
charter school or education service district that seeks to  employ the applicant. The fee shall be paid
by the school district, public charter school or education service district.
(8) Fees established under this section  shall cover, but not exceed, the full cost of administrative
expenses incurred by the commission during any biennium.
SECTION 33. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission by section 1, chapter  _____,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5537), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, is in-
creased by $100,000 for the conversion of teaching licenses into substitute teaching licenses
as described in ORS 342.125 (5).
EMPLOYMENT PROTECTIONS FOR SUPERINTENDENTS
SECTION 34.  ORS 334.225 is amended to read:
334.225. (1) The education service  district board shall employ a superintendent who must hold
an administrative license as a superintendent.  The superintendent shall serve as the board’s execu-
tive officer, give an official bond or an irrevocable letter of credit  issued by an insured institution,
as defined in ORS 706.008, and have the duties prescribed by the board and the laws of this state.
(2) The board shall fix the term and compensation of the superintendent,  provide office room for
the superintendent and allow  all of the superintendent’s necessary traveling expenses.  A contract
for employment of the superintendent may provide for the termination of employment of  the
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 15
superintendent prior to the expiration of the contract. If  the superintendent and the educa-
tion service  district board mutually agree to include a termination-without-cause provision
in the contract, the education service district board may  terminate the superintendent’s
employment, without cause, at  any time during the contract period only if the education
service district  board provides the superintendent with at least 12 months’ notice of the
termination. Nothing in this subsection authorizes the  education service district board to
make a wrongful termination or a  termination for any reason described in subsection (4) of
this section.
[(2)] (3) The education service district  board shall designate the superintendent as the district
clerk. The board may appoint qualified persons as deputies to the  superintendent to perform the
duties required of the district clerk by law or by the board.
(4)(a) An education service district board may not:
(A) Direct a superintendent to take any  action that conflicts with a local, state or federal
law that applies to education service districts;
(B) Take an adverse employment action against  a superintendent for complying with a
local, state or federal law that applies to education service districts; or
(C) Employ a superintendent pursuant to a contract that  purports to waive, or conflicts
with, any provision or requirement of subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph.
(b) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Local, state or federal law” means a  local, state or federal directive having the force
of law, including an ordinance, a city or county resolution, a statute,  a court decision, an
administrative rule or regulation, an order  issued in compliance with ORS chapter 183, an
executive order or any other  directive, declaration or statement that is issued in compliance
with the law as having the force of law and that is issued by a  local government as defined
in ORS 174.116, the state government as defined in ORS 174.111 or the federal government.
(B) “Superintendent” includes an interim superintendent.
SECTION 35.
 ORS 332.505, as amended by section 1, chapter 36, Oregon Laws  2022, is amended
to read:
332.505. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Instructional assistant” has the meaning given that term in ORS 342.120.
(b) “Intern teacher” means a regularly  enrolled candidate of an approved educator preparation
provider, as defined in ORS 342.120, who teaches under the  supervision of the staff of the provider
and of the employing district in  order to acquire practical experience in teaching and for which the
candidate receives both academic credit from the provider and financial compensation from the
school district or education service district.
(2) A district school board may:
(a) Employ a superintendent of schools and necessary assistant  superintendents for the district
and fix the terms and conditions of employment and the compensation. The district school  board
shall not contract with a superintendent for more than a period of three  years at a time. The con-
tract shall automatically  expire at the end of its term. Nothing in this paragraph prevents a district
school board from:
(A) Electing to issue a subsequent contract for an additional three years at any time.
(B) Including in the contract provisions that provide for the  termination of employment of the
superintendent prior to the expiration  of the contract. If the superintendent and the district school
board mutually agree to include a termination-without-cause provision  in the contract, the district
school  board  may terminate the superintendent’s employment, without cause, at any time during the
contract period only if the  district school board provides the superintendent with at least 12 months’
notice of the termination. Nothing in this subparagraph authorizes the district school board to  make
a wrongful termination or a termination for any reason described in subsection (3)(a)  of this section.
(b) Employ  personnel, including teachers and administrators, necessary to carry out the duties
and powers of the board and fix the duties, terms and conditions of employment  and the compen-
sation.
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 16
(c) Compensate district employees in any form which may include,  but shall not be limited to,
insurance, tuition reimbursement and salaries.
(d) Employ instructional  assistants and intern teachers subject to the rules of the State Board
of Education.
(3)(a) A district school board may not:
(A) Direct a  superintendent to take any action that conflicts with a local, state or federal law
that applies to school districts [ or education service districts ];
(B) Take an adverse  employment action against a superintendent for complying with a local,
state or federal law that applies to school districts [ or education service districts ]; or
(C) Employ a superintendent pursuant to a contract that purports to waive, or conflicts  with,
any provision or requirement of subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph.
(b) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Local, state or  federal law” means a local, state or federal directive having the force of
law, including an ordinance, a city or county resolution,  a statute, a court decision, an administra-
tive rule or  regulation, an order issued in compliance with ORS chapter 183, an executive order or
any other directive, declaration or statement that is issued in compliance with the law as  having
the force of law and that  is issued by a local government as defined in ORS 174.116, the state gov-
ernment as defined in ORS 174.111 or the federal government.
(B) “Superintendent” includes an interim superintendent.
(4) The district school board shall maintain written personnel  policies and make the policies
available for inspection by any school employee or member of the public.
(5) The superintendent of the school district  shall cause each employee to be specifically in-
formed of the existence and availability of the personnel policies.
EARLY CHILDHOOD SPECIAL EDUCATION OR EARLY INTERVENTION SERVICES
SECTION 36.
 ORS 329A.030, as amended by section 1, chapter 90, Oregon Laws 2022, is
amended to read:
329A.030. (1) The Office of Child Care shall  establish a Central Background Registry and may
maintain information in the registry through electronic records systems.
(2)(a) A subject individual  shall apply to and must be enrolled in the Central Background Reg-
istry as part of the individual’s application to operate  a program or serve in a position described in
subsection (10) of this section.
(b) An individual who has been the subject of a founded or substantiated  report of child abuse
shall apply to and must be  enrolled in the Central Background Registry prior to providing any of
the types of care identified in ORS 329A.250 (4)(b)(A), (G) or (H) if:
(A) The child abuse occurred on or  after January 1, 2017, and involved a child who died or
suffered serious physical injury, as defined in ORS 161.015; or
(B) The child abuse  occurred on or after September 1, 2019, and involved any child for whom
the individual was providing child care, as defined in ORS 329A.250  (4), or care identified in ORS
329A.250 (4)(b)(A), (C), (F), (G), (H) or (I).
(c) Notwithstanding  paragraph (a) of this subsection, an individual described in paragraph (b)(B)
of this subsection  is not required to enroll in the Central Background Registry if more than seven
years has elapsed since the date of the child abuse determination.
(3)(a) Upon receiving an application for  enrollment in the Central Background Registry, the of-
fice shall complete:
(A) A criminal records check under ORS 181A.195;
(B) A criminal records check of other registries or databases  in accordance with rules adopted
by the Early Learning Council;
(C) A child abuse and neglect records check  in accordance with rules adopted by the council;
and
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 17
(D) A foster care certification check and an adult protective services  check in accordance with
rules adopted by the council.
(b) In addition to the information that the office is required to check  under paragraph (a) of this
subsection, the office may consider any other information obtained by the office that  the office, by
rule, determines is relevant to enrollment in the Central Background Registry.
(4)(a) The office shall  enroll the individual in the Central Background Registry if the individual:
(A) Is determined to have no criminal, child abuse and neglect,  negative adult protective ser-
vices or negative foster home certification history, or  to have dealt with the issues and provided
adequate evidence of suitability for the registry;
(B) Has paid the applicable fee established pursuant to ORS 329A.275; and
(C) Has  complied with the rules of the Early Learning Council adopted pursuant to this section.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section and paragraph (a) of this subsection,  the office
may enroll an  individual in the registry if the Department of Human Services has completed a
background check on the individual  and the individual has received approval from the department
for purposes of providing child care.
(5)(a) Notwithstanding  subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the office may not enroll an indi-
vidual in the Central Background Registry if:
(A) The individual has a disqualifying condition as defined in rules adopted by the council; or
(B) The individual is an exempt prohibited individual, as provided by ORS 329A.252.
(b) If an individual prohibited  from enrolling in the registry as provided by this subsection is
enrolled in the registry, the office shall remove the individual from the registry.
(6)(a) The office may conditionally enroll an individual  in the Central Background Registry
pending the results  of a nationwide criminal records check through the Federal Bureau of Investi-
gation if the individual has successfully completed the criminal records  check and the child abuse
and neglect records check in this state and in the state of the individual’s  residence, if other than
Oregon.
(b) The office may enroll an individual in the registry subject to  limitations identified in rules
adopted by the council.
(7) An enrollment in the Central  Background Registry may be renewed upon application to the
office, payment of the fee established pursuant to ORS 329A.275 and compliance with rules adopted
by the Early Learning Council pursuant to this section. However, an individual who is determined
to be ineligible for enrollment in the registry after the date of initial enrollment  shall be removed
or suspended from the registry by the office.
(8)(a) A child care facility, preschool recorded program or school-age recorded program may not
hire or employ an individual if the individual is not enrolled in the Central Background Registry.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a child  care facility, preschool recorded
program or  school-age recorded program may employ on a probationary basis an individual who is
conditionally enrolled in the Central Background Registry.
(9) The  Early Learning Council may adopt any rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this
section, including but not  limited to rules regarding expiration and renewal periods and limitations
related to the subject individual’s enrollment in the Central Background Registry.
(10) As used  in this section, “subject individual” means a subject individual as defined by the
Early Learning  Council by rule, an individual subject to subsection (2)(b) of this section or a person
who applies to be:
(a) The operator or an employee of a child care or treatment program;
(b) The operator or an  employee of an Oregon prekindergarten program under ORS 329.170 to
329.200;
(c) The operator or an employee of a federal Head Start program  regulated by the United States
Department of Health and Human Services;
(d) An individual in a child care facility, preschool recorded  program or school-age recorded
program who may have unsupervised contact with children as identified by the office;
(e) A contractor or an employee of the contractor who :
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 18
(A) Provides  early childhood special education or early intervention services pursuant to ORS
343.455 to 343.534; and
(B) Is not subject to the criminal records check requirements of ORS 326.603 or 342.223;
(f) A child care  provider who is required to be enrolled in the Central Background Registry by
any state agency;
(g) A contractor, employee or volunteer of a metropolitan service district organized under  ORS
chapter 268 who may have unsupervised contact with children  and who is required to be enrolled
in the Central Background Registry by the metropolitan service district;
(h) A provider of respite services, as defined in  ORS 418.205, for parents pursuant to a properly
executed power of attorney under ORS 109.056 who is providing respite services  as a volunteer with
a private agency or organization that facilitates the provision of such respite services;
(i) The  operator or an employee of an early learning program as defined in rules adopted by the
council;  or
(j) The operator or an employee of a preschool recorded program or a  school-age recorded pro-
gram.
(11)(a) Information provided to a metropolitan service district  organized under ORS chapter 268
about the enrollment status of the persons described in subsection  (10)(g) of this section shall be
subject to a reciprocal agreement with  the metropolitan service district. The agreement must pro-
vide for the recovery of  administrative, including direct and indirect, costs incurred by the office
from participation in the agreement. Any moneys collected under  this paragraph shall be deposited
in the Child Care Fund established under ORS 329A.010.
(b) Information provided to a  private agency or organization facilitating the provision of respite
services, as defined in ORS 418.205, for parents pursuant to  a properly executed power of attorney
under ORS 109.056 about the enrollment status of  the persons described in subsection (10)(h) of this
section shall be subject to an agreement with the private  agency or organization. The agreement
must provide for the recovery of administrative, including direct  and indirect, costs incurred by the
office from participation in the agreement. Any moneys collected  under this paragraph shall be de-
posited in the Child Care Fund established under ORS 329A.010.
(c) Information provided to a private agency or organization about the enrollment status of  the
persons described  in subsection (10)(i) of this section shall be subject to an agreement with the
private agency or organization. The  agreement must provide for the recovery of administrative, in-
cluding direct and indirect, costs incurred  by the office from participation in the agreement. Any
moneys collected under this paragraph shall be deposited in the Child Care Fund established under
ORS 329A.010.
SECTION 37.
 ORS 329A.030,  as amended by section 26, chapter 27, Oregon Laws 2022, and
section 1, chapter 90, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
329A.030. (1) The Office of Child Care shall  establish a Central Background Registry and may
maintain information in the registry through electronic records systems.
(2)(a) A subject individual described in subsection (10)(a), (c) or (d) of this section shall  apply
to and must be enrolled in the Central Background Registry prior to the provision of care.
(b) An individual who has been the subject of a founded or substantiated  report of child abuse
shall apply to and must be  enrolled in the Central Background Registry prior to providing any of
the types of care identified in ORS 329A.250 (4)(b)(A), (G) or (H) if:
(A) The child abuse occurred on or  after January 1, 2017, and involved a child who died or
suffered serious physical injury, as defined in ORS 161.015; or
(B) The child abuse  occurred on or after September 1, 2019, and involved any child for whom
the individual was providing child care, as defined in ORS 329A.250  (4), or care identified in ORS
329A.250 (4)(b)(A), (C), (F), (G), (H) or (I).
(c) Notwithstanding  paragraph (a) of this subsection, an individual described in paragraph (b)(B)
of this subsection  is not required to enroll in the Central Background Registry if more than seven
years has elapsed since the date of the child abuse determination.
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 19
(3)(a) Upon receiving an application for  enrollment in the Central Background Registry, the of-
fice shall complete:
(A) A criminal records check under ORS 181A.195;
(B) A criminal records check of  other registries or databases in accordance with rules adopted
by the Early Learning Council;
(C) A child abuse and neglect records check in  accordance with rules adopted by the council;
and
(D) A foster care certification check and an adult protective services  check in accordance with
rules adopted by the council.
(b) In addition to the information that the office is required to check  under paragraph (a) of this
subsection, the office may consider any other information obtained by the office that  the office, by
rule, determines is relevant to enrollment in the Central Background Registry.
(4) The office shall enroll the individual in the Central Background Registry if the individual:
(a) Is determined  to have no criminal, child abuse and neglect, negative adult protective services
or negative foster home certification history, or to have dealt with  the issues and provided adequate
evidence of suitability for the registry;
(b) Has paid the applicable fee established pursuant to ORS 329A.275; and
(c) Has complied with the rules of the  Early Learning Council adopted pursuant to this section.
(5)(a) Notwithstanding  subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the office may not enroll an indi-
vidual in the Central Background Registry if:
(A) The individual has a disqualifying condition as defined in rules adopted by the council; or
(B) The individual is an exempt prohibited individual, as provided by ORS 329A.252.
(b) If an individual prohibited  from enrolling in the registry as provided by this subsection is
enrolled in the registry, the office shall remove the individual from the registry.
(6)(a) The office may conditionally enroll an individual  in the Central Background Registry
pending the results  of a nationwide criminal records check through the Federal Bureau of Investi-
gation if the individual has successfully completed the criminal records  check and the child abuse
and neglect records check in this state and in the state of the individual’s  residence, if other than
Oregon.
(b) The office may enroll an individual in the registry subject to  limitations identified in rules
adopted by the council.
(7) An enrollment in the Central  Background Registry may be renewed upon application to the
office, payment of the fee established pursuant to ORS 329A.275 and compliance with rules adopted
by the Early Learning Council pursuant to this section. However, an individual who is determined
to be ineligible for enrollment in the registry after the date of initial enrollment  shall be removed
or suspended from the registry by the office.
(8)(a) A child care facility, preschool recorded program or school-age recorded program may not
hire or employ an individual if the individual is not enrolled in the Central Background Registry.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a child  care facility, preschool recorded
program or  school-age recorded program may employ on a probationary basis an individual who is
conditionally enrolled in the Central Background Registry.
(9) The  Early Learning Council may adopt any rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this
section, including but not  limited to rules regarding expiration and renewal periods and limitations
related to the subject individual’s enrollment in the Central Background Registry.
(10) As used in this section, “subject individual” means:
(a) A subject individual as defined by the Early Learning Council by rule;
(b) An individual subject to subsection (2)(b) of this section;
(c) A person who applies to be:
(A) The operator or an employee of a child care or treatment program;
(B) The  operator or an employee of an Oregon prekindergarten program under ORS 329.170 to
329.200;
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 20
(C) The operator or an employee  of a federal Head Start program regulated by the United States
Department of Health and Human Services;
(D) An individual in a child care facility, preschool recorded program  or school-age recorded
program who may have unsupervised contact with children, as determined by the council by rule;
(E) A contractor or an employee of the contractor who :
(i) Provides early childhood special education or early intervention  services pursuant to ORS
343.455 to 343.534; and
(ii) Is not subject to the criminal records check requirements of ORS 326.603 or 342.223;
(F) A child care provider who is required to be  enrolled in the Central Background Registry by
any state agency;
(G) A contractor, employee or volunteer of a  metropolitan service district organized under ORS
chapter 268 who may have unsupervised contact with children  and who is required to be enrolled
in the Central Background Registry by the metropolitan service district;
(H) A  provider of respite services, as defined in ORS 418.205, for parents pursuant to a properly
executed power of attorney under ORS 109.056 who is providing respite services  as a volunteer with
a private agency or organization that facilitates the provision of such respite services;
(I) The operator or an employee of an early learning program as defined in rules adopted by  the
council; or
(J) The operator or an employee  of a preschool recorded program or a school-age recorded
program; or
(d)(A) An individual who operates a subsidized care facility;
(B) An individual who has attained 18 years of age and resides in a subsidized care facility; or
(C) An individual in a subsidized care facility who has attained 18 years  of age and who may
have unsupervised contact with children, as determined by the council by rule.
(11)(a) Information provided to a metropolitan service district  organized under ORS chapter 268
about the enrollment status of the persons described in subsection (10)(c)(G) of  this section shall be
subject to a reciprocal agreement with  the metropolitan service district. The agreement must pro-
vide for the recovery of  administrative, including direct and indirect, costs incurred by the office
from participation in the agreement. Any moneys collected under  this paragraph shall be deposited
in the Child Care Fund established under ORS 329A.010.
(b) Information provided to a  private agency or organization facilitating the provision of respite
services, as defined in ORS 418.205, for parents pursuant to  a properly executed power of attorney
under ORS 109.056 about the enrollment status of the persons described in subsection  (10)(c)(H) of
this section shall be subject to an agreement with the private agency or organization. The agree-
ment must provide for the recovery of administrative, including direct and  indirect, costs incurred
by the office  from participation in the agreement. Any moneys collected under this paragraph shall
be deposited in the Child Care Fund established under ORS 329A.010.
(c) Information provided to a private agency or organization about the enrollment status of  the
persons described in subsection (10)(c)(I) of this section shall  be subject to an agreement with the
private agency or organization. The  agreement must provide for the recovery of administrative, in-
cluding direct and indirect, costs incurred  by the office from participation in the agreement. Any
moneys collected under this paragraph shall be deposited in the Child Care Fund established under
ORS 329A.010.
BEGINNING TEACHER AND ADMINISTRATOR PROGRAM
SECTION 38.
 ORS 342.940 is amended to read:
342.940. (1) As used in this section and  ORS 342.943, “educator” means a teacher, administrator
or other school professional who is  licensed, registered or certified by the Teacher Standards and
Practices Commission.
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 21
(2) The Educator Advancement  Council shall be established and function under an intergovern-
mental agreement, pursuant to ORS 190.003 to 190.130. The purposes of the council are  to provide
resources related to educator professional learning and to provide other educator supports.
(3) Parties to the intergovernmental agreement establishing the council must include:
(a) The Department of Education;
(b) The Early Learning Division;
(c) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission;
(d) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission;
(e) A school district; and
(f) An education service district.
(4) The intergovernmental agreement establishing  the council shall outline the governance
framework and the administrative details necessary for the efficient and effective implementation
of the duties of the council, including:
(a) Designating the maximum number of members of the council.
(b) Identifying the process for the council to select the chairperson of the council. The chair-
person must be one of the members of the council and shall be responsible for overseeing official
council business.
(c) Identifying the process for the council to appoint the executive director of the  council. Ap-
pointment of the executive director must be by written order, filed with the  Secretary of State, and
the executive  director shall serve at the pleasure of the council. The executive director shall be
responsible for the daily operations of the council, including the appointment  of all subordinate of-
ficers  and  employees of the council. Officers and employees of the council shall be considered per-
sons in  state service for purposes of ORS chapter 240, and, subject to ORS chapter 240, the
executive director shall prescribe their duties and fix their compensation.
(5)(a) The council shall consist of:
(A) Members who are representatives  of the parties to the intergovernmental agreement estab-
lishing the council, as identified in subsection (3) of this section.
(B) No more than  10 members who are practicing educators, early learning providers and pro-
fessionals and school district board members.
(C) No more than 10 members who are representatives of  educator preparation providers,
education-focused nonprofit organizations, education-focused philanthropic  organizations, profes-
sional education  associations, community-based education organizations that represent families and
students, post-secondary institutions  of education and federally recognized Indian tribes of this state.
(b) Subject to any limits designated as provided by the intergovernmental agreement establishing
the council, the majority of the members of the  council identified under paragraph (a) of this sub-
section may propose additional members of the council. The inclusion of additional members on  the
council shall be  subject to the procedures established by the council under the intergovernmental
agreement.
(6) The council shall:
(a) Establish a system of educator networks, as described in ORS 342.943, by  which every edu-
cator in this state has access to professional learning opportunities;
(b) Administer the beginning teacher and administrator mentorship  program under ORS
329.788 to 329.820;
[(b)] (c) Coordinate the distribution of moneys to educator  networks from the Educator Ad-
vancement Fund based on the needs of the educators identified by the networks;
[(c)] (d) Connect educator networks and facilitate communications within and among the net-
works to improve teaching and learning; and
[(d)] (e) Continuously assess  the needs of educators in this state and coordinate priorities based
on the moneys available for distribution from the Educator Advancement Fund.
(7) The Department of Education  shall provide support to the strategic direction of the council
by:
(a) Conducting and coordinating research to monitor:
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 22
(A) Teaching and learning conditions;
(B) Educator workforce supply and demand; and
(C) Common  outcomes and measures anticipated to promote improvement in teaching and
learning.
(b) Assisting the council in coordinating and  connecting educator networks, supporting profes-
sional learning priorities, enabling access to professional  learning and supports, leveraging funding
sources and managing innovation funds.
(c) Recommending statutory and agency rule changes needed to support the purposes of  the
council.
(d) Supporting programs that help to achieve the purposes of the Educators Equity Act.
(e) Supporting a statewide plan for increasing:
(A) The supply of culturally diverse teacher candidates; and
(B) The successful recruitment of effective educators  to work in high-need schools and in prac-
tice areas with a shortage of educators.
(f) Identifying high-leverage educator practices to be developed by  educators throughout their
careers.
(g) Providing accountability of the council by ensuring that the council:
(A) Gives preference, when  making recommendations about funding distributions, to entities that
have demonstrated success in improving student indicators.
(B) Considers the delivery of services for the benefit of all regions of this state when establish-
ing the system of educator networks.
(C) Works toward improving student  progress indicators identified by the Department of Edu-
cation or set forth in ORS 350.014.
(D) Includes and connects education providers  and leaders from prekindergarten through post-
secondary education.
(h) Providing staff support for the administrative functions of the council.
(i) Developing a system that allows for the statewide dissemination of emerging practices  and
evidence-based  models.
(j) Providing technical assistance to  the council, including online systems for sharing profes-
sional learning resources and supporting educator networks.
(k) Administering the  distribution of grant and contract funds for programs described in this
section.
(L) Providing administrative support to the educator networks, including:
(A) Making recommendations to the council about the selection of  the sponsors of educator
networks;
(B) Providing technical assistance to educator networks; and
(C) Entering into grant  agreements or contracts for the distribution of funds to educator net-
works.
(8)(a) The State Board of Education  and the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission may
adopt any rules necessary at  the request of the council to support the council or to perform any
duties assigned to the board or commission under this section.
(b) The council may adopt rules pursuant  to ORS chapter 183 for the [ purpose of ORS ] purposes
of ORS 329.788 to 329.820 and  342.943.
(9) The council shall be considered a board for purposes of ORS chapter 180.
SECTION 39.
 ORS 329.788 is amended to read:
329.788. As used in ORS 329.788 to 329.820:
(1) “Beginning administrator” means a principal or superintendent who:
(a) Possesses an administrative license issued by the Teacher  Standards and Practices Commis-
sion;
(b) Is employed as a principal or superintendent by a school district; and
(c) Has been assigned for fewer than two school years in the administrator’s present position.
(2) “Beginning teacher” means a teacher who:
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 23
(a) Possesses a teaching license issued by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission;
(b) Is employed at least half-time, primarily as a classroom teacher, by a school district; and
(c) Has taught fewer  than two school years as a licensed probationary teacher in any public,
private or state-operated school in any state.
(3) “Educator network” means an educator network established under ORS 342.943.
(4) “Mentor” means an individual who:
(a) Is an acting or retired teacher, principal or superintendent;
(b) Has met established best practice and research-based  criteria as defined by the [ State Board
of Education ] Educator Advancement Council  by rule;
(c) Possesses a  teaching or administrative license issued by the Teacher Standards and Practices
Commission;
(d) Has successfully served for five or more years as a licensed teacher, principal or super-
intendent in any public school; and
(e) Has been selected and trained as described in ORS 329.815.
(5) “Mentorship program” means a program provided by  a mentor to a beginning teacher or
administrator that includes, but is not limited to, direct classroom observation and consultation,
assistance in instructional planning and preparation, support in implementation and  delivery of
classroom instruction, development of school leadership skills and other assistance intended to assist
the beginning teacher  or administrator to become a confident and competent professional educator
who makes a positive impact on student learning.
SECTION 40.
 ORS 329.795 is amended to read:
329.795. (1) The [ State Board of Education ] Educator Advancement Council  shall establish a
beginning teacher and administrator mentorship program to provide  eligible beginning teachers and
administrators in this  state with a continued and sustained mentorship program from a formally
assigned mentor.
(2) Any  school district or educator network is eligible to participate in the mentorship program.
(3) A school  district may participate through an educator network or may enter into a part-
nership with another school district, an institution of higher education,  an education service district
or another organization to operate jointly a mentorship program if:
(a) All moneys received as grants-in-aid  for the mentorship program are administered by the
participating school district or educator network to  provide direct services to beginning teachers
and administrators; and
(b) All other requirements of ORS 329.788 to 329.820 are met.
(4) All programs in ORS 329.788 to 329.820 are subject to the availability of  funds appropriated
therefor.
SECTION 41.
 ORS 329.800 is amended to read:
329.800. (1) Each school district or educator network that wishes to participate in the  beginning
teacher and administrator mentorship program shall submit a formal application to  the [ Department
of Education ] Educator Advancement Council . The application shall include:
(a) A description of the  priorities to be addressed by moneys received by a school district or
an educator network for the mentorship program, as described in ORS 329.805 (2);
(b) The names of all eligible beginning teachers and administrators employed by the  school dis-
trict or a school district within the educator network and a description of their assignments; and
(c) A description of the proposed mentorship program, which must provide  at least 75-90 hours
of frequent contact between the mentors and beginning teachers and administrators throughout the
school year.
(2) The school district or educator network shall certify in the application  that no eligible be-
ginning professional  educators are or may be under a conditional license, except as provided in rules
of the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission.
SECTION 42.
 ORS 329.805 is amended to read:
329.805. (1) Subject to ORS 291.232 to  291.260, the [ Department of Education ] Educator Ad-
vancement Council shall distribute grants-in-aid to qualifying  school districts or educator networks
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 24
to offset the costs of beginning teacher  and administrator mentorship programs. A qualifying district
or educator network shall receive annually an amount that is aligned with evidence-based  best
practices.
(2) If the  funds are insufficient for all eligible proposals, the [ Department of Education ] Educator
Advancement Council shall award grants on a competitive basis, taking into consideration:
(a) The priorities to be addressed by moneys  received by a school district or an educator net-
work, including efforts related to:
(A) Increasing the number of culturally and linguistically diverse educators hired; and
(B) Reflecting the demographics of the students of the  school district or school districts within
the educator network with the demographics of the educators of the school district or  school dis-
tricts within the educator network; and
(b) Whether the school district is a  small school district or serves a rural community or whether
the educator network serves small school districts or a rural community.
(3) The [ State Board of Education ] Educator Advancement Council  may adopt such rules as
[it] the council considers appropriate for the distribution of grants-in-aid under this section.
(4) A school district or an educator network that is determined by the [Department of
Education] Educator Advancement Council  to be in violation of  one or more of the requirements
of ORS 329.788 to 329.820 may be required  to refund all grants-in-aid moneys distributed under ORS
329.788 to 329.820. The amount of penalty  shall be determined by the [ State Board of Education ]
Educator Advancement Council .
SECTION 43.
 ORS 329.810 is amended to read:
329.810. (1) After consulting with representatives  of teachers, administrators, school boards,
schools of education, the public universities listed in ORS 352.002 and such  others as it considers
appropriate, the [ Department of Education ] Educator Advancement Council  shall  approve training
for mentors and beginning teachers and administrators in programs qualifying for grants-in-aid under
ORS 329.788 to 329.820.
(2) The training curriculum for mentors shall be based on research and knowledge of the  needs
of beginning teachers and administrators.
(3) Mentors shall  be trained to build relationships of trust and mutual collaboration with be-
ginning teachers and administrators.
(4) Mentors shall receive professional  development before the school year begins and throughout
the school year.
SECTION 44.
 ORS 329.815 is amended to read:
329.815. (1) Based on the requirements of ORS 329.788 to 329.820, the selection,  nature and ex-
tent of duties of mentors shall be determined:
(a) By the school district that is the  employer of the teacher or administrator and of the mentor;
[or]
(b) Jointly by the school district  that is the employer of the teacher or administrator and the
school district that is the employer of the mentor[ .]; or
(c) By an educator network, as described in ORS 342.943.
(2) A teacher, principal or superintendent may not be designated as  a mentor unless willing to
perform in that role.
(3) For purposes of actions taken under ORS 342.805 to 342.937:
(a) A mentor may not participate  in the evaluation of a beginning teacher or administrator as-
signed to the mentor; and
(b) Any written or other reports of a mentor regarding a beginning teacher or administrator
assigned to the mentor may not be used in the evaluation of the beginning teacher  or administrator.
(4) Each  mentor shall complete successfully training provided or approved by the [ Department
of Education ] Educator Advancement Council  while participating in  the beginning teacher and
administrator mentorship program.
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 25
(5) The stipend received for each beginning teacher  or administrator may be used by the school
district or educator network to compensate mentors  or to compensate other individuals assigned
duties to provide release time for teachers, principals or superintendents acting as mentors.
SECTION 45.  ORS 329.820 is amended to read:
329.820. (1) The [ Department of Education ] Educator Advancement Council shall be responsible
for the regular and  ongoing evaluation of implementation and administration of programs under ORS
329.788 to 329.820 and may contract for such evaluation. The  [ department] council may not expend
in a biennium more than 2.5 percent of the total  amount of moneys available for the programs on
the evaluation of the programs. The evaluation may include assessments of the following:
(a) The effectiveness of the mentorship program in the retention of beginning teachers and  ad-
ministrators in a school district that has participated in the program and in the profession; and
(b) Student performance on statewide and other assessments.
(2) The [ department] council may accept contributions of moneys and assistance for the purpose
of the evaluation of programs from any source, public or private, and  agree to conditions placed on
the moneys not inconsistent with ORS 329.788 to 329.820. All  moneys received by the [ department]
council under this subsection shall be deposited into the [ Department of Education Account ] Edu-
cator Advancement Fund  to be used for the evaluation of programs conducted  under this section.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 46.
The unit captions  used in this 2023 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 47. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 24, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 283 (SB 283-B) Page 26